Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 6. Alaska Gasoline Products Leasing Act.

Cross references. —

For failure to comply with AS

45.50.800

—

45.50.850

as an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

; for legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this article, see § 1, ch. 234, SLA 1976 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.50.800.
Disclosures to be made by distributors and refiners before conclusion of agreement.

Before entry into a lease agreement, a refiner or distributor shall disclose to the dealer facts that would reasonably be considered material to the dealer’s decision to enter into the lease. These facts must include, but not be limited to,

ownership of property of the retail outlet;

if the real property is not owned by a refiner or distributor, then the nature of the relationship between the real property owner and the refiner or distributor and the length of the underlying lease, if applicable;

the last known addresses of dealers operating the retail outlet for the last five years;

the gasoline gallonage history, if any, of the station for the last five years;

any sales goals or quotas the refiners or distributors intend to apply to the station;

the nearest gasoline outlet owned, controlled, or operated by the refiner or distributor and any plans the distributor or refiner has to open new retail outlets within the trade area of the retail outlet; and

any plans the refiner or distributor has for the future of the subject retail outlet.

History.

(§ 2 ch 234 SLA 1976)

Sec. 45.50.810.
Violations.

A person may not, directly or indirectly, through officers, employees, or agents,

require the dealer at the time of entering into the lease agreement to relieve any person from liability imposed by AS

45.50.800

—

45.50.850

;

require the dealer to agree to waive the right to a jury trial or any right of counterclaim the dealer may have;

restrict or inhibit directly or indirectly the right of free association for any lawful purpose of the dealer;

except as to the initial inventory, require a dealer to purchase or otherwise lease goods or services of a refiner or distributor or from an approved source of supply unless and to the extent that the refiner or distributor satisfies the burden of proving that such restricted purchasing agreements are reasonably necessary for lawful purposes justified on business grounds and do not substantially affect competition; in determining whether a requirement to purchase is lawful, the court shall be guided by the decisions of the courts of the United States in interpreting and applying the antitrust laws and the Federal Trade Commission Act of the United States;

impose unreasonable standards of performance on the dealer;

require a dealer to participate financially in the use of any premium coupon or giveaway or rebate in the operation of the business; however, a distributor may require the dealer to distribute premiums, coupons, or giveaways to customers that are provided to the dealer at the expense of the refiner or distributor or when the promotion is self-liquidating;

fail to deal with the dealer in good faith;

require the dealer to keep the retail outlet open for business more than 12 consecutive hours a day or more than six days a week; however, this paragraph may not be construed to prevent a retail outlet from being open when required to be open to conform to a state or federal law or regulation; or

require a dealer to purchase or rent a product or service for more than a fair and reasonable price.

A refiner or distributor may not, directly or indirectly, through any officer, agent, or employee, terminate, cancel, or fail to renew a dealer lease without first giving written notice setting out all of the reasons for the termination or cancellation, or intent not to renew to the dealer at least 45 days in advance of the termination, cancellation, or failure to renew except when

the alleged grounds are voluntary abandonment by the dealer of the lessee relationship, the above notice may be given five days in advance of the termination, cancellation, or failure to renew;

the alleged grounds are the conviction of the dealer in a court of competent jurisdiction of a felony;

the lease specifically establishes a period of notice of less than 45 days in which either party may terminate the lease.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, a refiner or distributor may not terminate, cancel, or fail to renew a dealer lease without good cause. Good cause includes

the failure of a dealer to comply with the lawful material provisions of a lease between the distributor or refiner and the dealer and to cure each default after being given written notice and a reasonable opportunity to cure the default;

an adjudication that the dealer is a bankrupt or insolvent or if the dealer makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors or a similar disposition of assets of franchise business or voluntarily abandons the business or is convicted of or pleads guilty or no contest to a charge of violating any law relating to any business;

the good faith business decision of the lessor that the lessor no longer requires a retail outlet at that location for the marketing of gasoline; and

the dealer’s failure to sign the new agreement if at the time of renewal of the lease the distributor or refiner and the dealer cannot agree upon new terms and the terms offered by the refiner or distributor do not violate any other laws of the state or of the United States and the terms are essentially the same as those offered to other dealers in similar retail outlets and do not discriminate against the subject dealer.

A refiner or distributor may provide in the lease for its termination without cause during a reasonable trial period, not to exceed one year, if the dealer involved has not already been a dealer of a refiner or distributor for that period of time.

A refiner or distributor may not engage in price discrimination between dealers if the effect of the discrimination may be substantially to lessen competition unless that discrimination is based upon quantity purchased or transportation costs or capital investment of the dealer. Nothing in this section prevents a refiner or distributor from offering a lower price or furnishing a service or facility to a dealer when the offer is made in good faith to meet an equally low price of a competitor, or the services or facilities furnished by that competitor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 234 SLA 1976; am §§ 43, 44 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For the Federal Trade Commission Act, see 15 U.S.C. 41 et seq.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, at the end of the introductory language in (c), substituted “Good cause includes” for “Good cause shall include without limitation:”; in (d), substituted “A refiner or distributor may” for “a refiner or distributor shall be permitted to” at the beginning.

Sec. 45.50.820.
Obligation of distributor to repurchase upon termination, etc., of agreement.

If the refiner or distributor terminates, cancels, or fails to renew under AS

45.50.810(c)(1)

, (2), or (3) or for any good cause other than under AS

45.50.810(c)(4)

, the refiner or distributor shall compensate the dealer for the fair market value of the business, excluding goodwill. Refiners or distributors terminating, canceling, or failing to renew under AS

45.50.810(c)(4)

shall compensate the dealer for the fair market value of the business, including good will. Valuation other than good will shall include the fair market value of the dealer’s inventory supplies, equipment, and furnishings purchased from the refiner or distributor exclusive of personalized materials that do not have a value to the refiner or distributor and inventory supplies, equipment, and furnishings not reasonably required in the conduct of the business. Compensation shall be made within 60 days from the date of termination unless it is necessary that a lawsuit be filed under AS

45.50.830

. The refiner or distributor may offset against accounts owed by the dealer under this section any amount owed by the dealer to the refiner or distributor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 234 SLA 1976; am § 126 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.50.825.
Right of first refusal of surviving spouse.

Unless provided otherwise by the lease, upon the death of the lessee the lease shall terminate and the surviving spouse shall have the right of first refusal of the new lease if the surviving spouse has been an active participant in the business and is qualified.

History.

(§ 2 ch 234 SLA 1976)

Sec. 45.50.830.
Court to determine fair market value when parties cannot agree.

If under AS

45.50.820

the distributor or refiner has good cause and the distributor or refiner and the dealer cannot agree on the fair market value of the business, then either party may initiate an action in the superior court where the retail outlet exists. Reasonable attorney fees and the appraiser fees shall be awarded to the dealer if the amount awarded to the dealer by the jury or the court is 10 percent higher than the final offer, if any, made by the refiner or distributor before the filing of the lawsuit.
If the amount awarded to the dealer by the jury or the court is 10 percent lower than the final offer, if any, made by the refiner or distributor before the filing of the lawsuit, reasonable attorney fees and the appraiser fees shall be awarded to the refiner or distributor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 234 SLA 1976)

Sec. 45.50.840.
Definitions.

In AS

45.50.800

—

45.50.830

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“dealer” means a person primarily engaged in the sale of gasoline to the motoring public through a retail outlet leased from the refiner or distributor or its agent by the person and operated by the person;

“distributor” means any person or corporation other than a refiner engaged in the sale, assignment, or distribution of gasoline to four or more dealer-operated retail outlets;

“gasoline” means all products commonly or commercially known or sold as gasoline;

“lease” means an oral or written contract or agreement or series of agreements, either express or implied, in which the dealer is required directly or indirectly to purchase 50 percent or more of the dealer’s supply of gasoline from a distributor or refiner and in which the dealer is granted authority to occupy premises owned, leased, or in any way controlled, directly or indirectly, by the refiner or distributor;

“refiner” means a company, corporation, or individual who owns or controls, or controls through a substantially owned subsidiary, partnership, or joint venture, a refinery used for the production of gasoline, diesel, or other motor vehicle fuels.

History.

(§ 2 ch 234 SLA 1976; am § 45 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (5), substituted “‘refiner’ means” for “‘refiner’ is” at the beginning.

Sec. 45.50.850.
Short title.

AS

45.50.800

—

45.50.850

may be cited as the Alaska Gasoline Products Leasing Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 234 SLA 1976)